District of Columbia statutes.
19-1304.09

Noncharitable trust without ascertainable beneficiary.

Except as otherwise provided in section 19-1304.08 or by D.C. Official Code § 43-113, the following rules apply:

(1)

A trust may be created for a noncharitable purpose without a definite or definitely ascertainable beneficiary or for a noncharitable but otherwise valid purpose to be selected by the trustee. The trust may not be enforced for more than 21 years.

(2)

A trust authorized by this section may be enforced by a person appointed in the terms of the trust or, if no person is so appointed, by a person appointed by the court.

(3)

Property of a trust authorized by this section may be applied only to its intended use, except to the extent the court determines that the value of the trust property exceeds the amount required for the intended use. Except as otherwise provided in the terms of the trust, property not required for the intended use must be distributed to the settlor, if then living, otherwise to the settlor’s successors in interest.

History

Mar. 10, 2004, D.C. Law 15-104, § 2(b), 51 DCR 208

Section References

This section is referenced in § 19-1301.10 and § 19-1304.02.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 409 of the Uniform Trust Code.